src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
tehđä+V:te v1tehda ;
nähđä+V:nä v1nahda ;
jakkaat+V:jaka v2 ;
joikkaat+V:joikka v2 ;
alkkaat+V:alka v2 ;
jatkaat+V:jatka v2 ;
pallaat+V:pala v2 ;
vallaat+V:vala v2 ;
painaat+V:paina v2 ;
tappaat+V:tappa v2 ;
jaksaat+V:jaksa v2 ;
kaattaat+V+TV:kaata v2 ;
hoittaat+V+TV:hoita v2 ;
anttaat+V+TV:anta v2 ;
kanttaat+V+TV:kanta v2 ;
paarttaat+V+TV:paarta v2 ;
haastaat+V:haasta v2 ;
haistaat+V:haista v2 ;
paistaat+V:paista v2 ;
poistaat+V:poista v2 ;
luistaat+V:luista v2 ;
ostaat+V:osta v2 ;
nostaat+V:nosta v2 ;
raattaat+V+TV:raatta v2 ;
sattaat+V+TV:sata v2 ;
taittaat+Hom2+V:taitta v2 ;  ! taittoi, taittanu
naittaat+V+TV:naitta v2 ;
voittaat+V+TV:voitta v2 ;
suittaat+V+TV:suitta v2 ;
polttaat+V+TV:poltta v2 ;
ottaat+V+TV:otta v2 ;
luottaat+V+TV:luotta v2 ;
vuottaat+V+TV:vuotta v2 ;
auttaat+V+TV:autta v2 ;
höystäät+V:höystä v2 ;
riuttaat+V+TV:riutta v2 ;
juttaat+V+TV:juta v2 ;
nouttaat+V+TV:nouta v2 ;
huuttaat+V+TV:huuta v2_si ;
murttaat+V+TV:murta v2_si ;
uurttaat+V+TV:uurta v2_si ;
kaivaat+V:kaiva v2 ;
hakkeet+V:hake v2 ;
kulkkeet+V:kulke v2 ;
sulkkeet+V:sulke v2 ;
sylkkeet+V:sylke v2 ;
särkkeet+V:särke v2 ;
iskeet+V:iske v2 ;
puskeet+V:puske v2 ;
itkeet+V:itke v2 ;
sotkeet+V:sotke v2 ;
lukkeet+V:luke v2 ;
immeet+V:ime v2 ;
lähteet+V:lähte v2 ; ! TODO tarkista lähti
tuntteet+V:tunte v2 ;
hoiperoitteet+V:hoiperoitt2e v2 ;
kutteet+V:kute v2 ;
ehtiit+V:ehti v2 ;
kuohiit+V:kuohi v2 ;
vihkiit+V:vihki v2 ;
poikkiit+V:poiki v2 ;
lakkiit+V:lakki v2 ;
palkkiit+V:palkki v2 ;
ruokkiit+V:ruokki v2 ;
märkkiit+V:märki v2 ;
kukkiit+V:kukki v2 ;
tukkiit+V:tukki v2 ;
henkkiit+V:henki v2 ;
onkkiit+V:onki v2 ;
roiskiit+V:roiski v2 ;
pärskiit+V:pärski v2 ;
raajiit+V:raaji v2 ;
yskiit+V:yski v2 ;
potkiit+V:potki v2 ;
nykkiit+V:nyki v2 ;
määkkiit+V:määki v2 ;
juhliit+V:juhli v2 ;
sääliit+V:sääli v2 ;
pehmiit+V:pehmi v2 ;
ryömiit+V:ryömi v2 ;
silmiit+V:silmi v2 ;
painiit+V:paini v2 ;
näppiit+V:näppi v2 ;
reppiit+V:repi v2 ;
kraappiit+V:kraappi v2 ;
vieriit+V:vieri v2 ;
munniit+V:muni v2 ;
kääriit+V:kääri v2 ;
tanssiit+V:tanssi v2 ;
pessiit+V:pesi v2 ;
nussiit+V:nussi v2 ;
talssiit+V:talsi v2 ;
praattiit+V:praatti v2 ;
ylönkattoot+V:ylön#katt2o v2 ;
lihhoot+V:liho v2 ;
kakkoot+V:kako v2 ;
piikkoot+V:piiko v2 ;
laukkoot+V:laukko v2 ;
piiskoot+V:piisko v2 ;
katkoot+V:katko v2 ;
neuloot+V:neulo v2 ;
irtisannoot+V:irti#sano v2 ;
punnoot+V:puno v2 ;
varroot+V:varo v2 ;
verssoot+V:verso v2 ;
liuhtoot+V:liuhto v2 ;
vaistoot+V:vaisto v2 ;
rauttoot+V:rauto v2 ;
ulvoot+V:ulvo v2 ; !  -v ei geminoidu tässä koska ennen sitä oon pitkä tavu.
neuvoot+V:neuvo v2 ;
kuohuut+V:kuohu v2 ;
huojuut+V:huoju v2 ;
liukkuut+V:liuku v2 ;
roikkuut+V:roikku v2 ;
tottuut+V:tottu v2 ;
hoikkuut+V:hoiku v2 ;
sokkuut+V:sokku v2 ;
paukkuut+V:paukku v2 ;
kulkkuut+V:kulku v2 ;
priiskuut+V:priisku v2 ;
jatkuut+V:jatku v2 ;
huiluut+V:huilu v2 ;
sammuut+V:sammu v2 ;
riippuut+V:riippu v2 ;
juoppuut+V:juopu v2 ;
lappuut+V:lappu v2 ;
hauruut+V:hauru v2 ;
paissuut+V:paisu v2 ;
maattuut+V:maatu v2 ;
laihtuut+V:laihtu v2 ;
koittuut+V:koitu v2 ;
juurttuut+V:juurtu v2 ;
kastuut+V:kastu v2 ;
ruiđalaistuut+V:ruiđalaistu v2 ;
paistuut+V:paistu v2 ;
sattuut+V:sattu v2 ;
laittuut+V:laittu v2 ;
erottuut+V:erottu v2 ;
hauttuut+V:hautu v2 ;
muuttuut+V:muuttu v2 ;
kouttuut+V:koutu v2 ;
säilyyt+V:säily v2 ;
häippyyt+V:häipy v2 ;
viippyyt+V:viipy v2 ;
kyssyyt+V:kysy v2 ;
eksyyt+V:eksy v2 ;
määnttyyt+V:määnty v2 ;
käänttyyt+V:käänty v2 ;
nöyrttyyt+V:nöyrty v2 ;
estyyt+V:esty v2 ;
liittyyt+V:liitty v2 ;
tyttyyt+V:tyty v2 ;
täyttyyt+Err/Orth:täyt4y v2 ; ! täytyy
häättyyt+V:hääty v2 ;
hyöttyyt+V:hyöty v2 ;
vettäät+V+TV:vetä v2 ;
pittäät+V:pitä v2 ;
lenttäät+V:lentä v2 ;
työnttäät+V+TV:työntä v2 ;
kierttäät+V+TV:kiertä v2 ;
pyörttäät+V+TV:pyörtä v2 ;
pistäät+V:pistä v2 ;
heittäät+V+TV:heittä v2 ;
liittäät+V+TV:liittä v2 ;
välttäät+V+TV:välttä v2 ;
kylmetyttäät+V+TV:kylmetyttä v2 ;
sisälyttäät+V+TV:sisälyttä v2 ;
jättäät+V+TV:jättä v2 ;
syöttäät+V+TV:syöttä v2 ;
nuottiit+V:nuotti v2 ;
syyttäät+V+TV:syyttä v2 ;
pyyttäät+V+TV:pyytä v2_si ;
löyttäät+V+TV:löytä v2_si ;
realiseeraanttuut+V:realiseeraantu v2_long ;
assimileeraanttuut+V:assimileeraantu v2_long ;
erkkainuttaat+V+TV:erkkainutta v2_long ;
norjalaistaat+V:norjalaista v2_long ;
ojenastaat+V:ojenasta v2_long ;
ruiđalaistaat+V:ruiđalaista v2_long ;
sekhaanuttaat+V+TV:sekhaanutta v2_long ;
vakavoittaat+V+TV:vakavoitta v2_long ;
vahingoittaat+V+TV:vahingoitta v2_long ;
kunnioittaat+V+TV:kunnioitta v2_long ;
happanuttaat+V+TV:happanutta v2_long ;
paranuttaat+V+TV:paranutta v2_long ;
totteinuttaat+V+TV:totteinutta v2_long ;
oksenuttaat+V+TV:oksenutta v2_long ;
muretuttaat+V+TV:muretutta v2_long ;
aivastuttaat+V+TV:aivastutta v2_long ;
huolestuttaat+V+TV:huolestutta v2_long ;
olestuttaat+V+TV:olestutta v2_long ;
kauhistuttaat+V+TV:kauhistutta v2_long ;
rikastuttaat+V+TV:rikastutta v2_long ;
tukahđuttaat+V+TV:tukahđutta v2_long ;
sylkäisestäät+V:sylkäisestä v2_long ;
tarvita+Err/Orth:tarvi v2 ; 
